West Virginia, session 2025, SB861.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. APPROPRIATIONS, EXPENDITURES, AND DEDUCTIONS. §12-3-10e. Purchasing Card Advisory Committee created; purpose; membership; expenses. There is created a Purchasing Card Advisory Committee to enhance the development and implementation of the purchasing card program. The committee shall solicit input from state agencies and make recommendations to improve the performance of the Purchasing Card Program. The committee consists of fourteen members to be appointed as follows:(1) The Auditor shall serve as chairperson of the committee and shall appoint four members from the state College System of West Virginia and the University System of West Virginia, one member from the Department of Human Services one member from the Division of Highways and two additional members at large from any state agency;(2) The Secretary of the Department of Administration shall appoint one member from the Information Services and Communications Division Office of Technology, one member from the Financial Accounting and Reporting Section, and one member from the Purchasing Division;(3) The Secretary of the Department of Revenue shall appoint one member from the Department of Revenue; and(4) The State Treasurer shall appoint one member from that office. Committee members shall be appointed for a term of one year, commencing on July 1, 1998. Committee members shall receive reimbursement for expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties on the committee.